Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-786
Obstetricians/gynecologists as primary care physicians; requirements.

On or after July 1, 1996, any entity which offers any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy, subscriber contract, health maintenance organization contract, or hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy which is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state shall include obstetricians/gynecologists as primary care physicians if they otherwise qualify as a primary care physician pursuant to the credentialing or recredentialing standards of that entity and they perform all of the functions of a primary care physician according to the terms and conditions of such entity's primary care physician contract.

Laws 1996, LB 532, § 1.